California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) Region 2 shall include all counties with lowest quartile rents below four hundred dollars ($400). There shall be a 4.9 percent reduction in the minimum basic standard of adequate care for counties in Region 2. Region 2 shall consist of the following counties:

(A) Alpine County

(B) Amador County

(C) Butte County

(D) Calaveras County

(E) Colusa County

(F) Del Norte County

(G) El Dorado County

(H) Fresno County

(I) Glenn County

(J) Humboldt County

(K) Imperial County

(L) Inyo County

(M) Kern County

(N) Kings County

(O) Lake County

(P) Lassen County

(Q) Madera County

(R) Mariposa County

(S) Mendocino County

(T) Merced County

(U) Modoc County

(V) Mono County

(W) Nevada County

(X) Placer County

(Y) Plumas County

(Z) Riverside County

(AA) Sacramento County

(AB) San Benito County

(AC) San Bernardino County

(AD) San Joaquin County

(AE) Shasta County

(AF) Sierra County

(AG) Siskiyou County

(AH) Stanislaus County

(AI) Sutter County

(AJ) Tehama County

(AK) Trinity County

(AL) Tulare County

(AM) Tuolumne County

(AN) Yolo County

(AO) Yuba County

(c) This section shall be operative during such time as subdivision (a) of Section 11450.018 is operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 307, Sec. 10.   Effective August 3, 1995.   Section conditionally operative as provided in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

11453.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the amounts set forth in Section 11452 and subdivision (a) of Section 11450 shall be adjusted annually by the department to reflect any increases or decreases in the cost of living. These adjustments shall become effective July 1 of each year, unless otherwise specified by the
 Legislature. For the 2000–01 fiscal year to the 2003–04 fiscal year, inclusive, these adjustments shall become effective October 1 of each year. The cost-of-living adjustment shall be calculated by the Department of Finance based on the changes in the California Necessities Index, which as used in this section means the weighted average changes for food, clothing, fuel, utilities, rent, and transportation for low-income consumers. The computation of annual adjustments in the California Necessities Index shall be made in accordance with the following steps:

(1) The base period expenditure amounts for each expenditure category within the California Necessities Index used to compute the annual grant adjustment are:Food$ 3,027Clothing (apparel and upkeep)406Fuel and other utilities529Rent, residential4,883Transportation1,757Total$10,602(2) Based on the appropriate components of the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, the percentage change shall be determined
 for the 12-month period ending with the December preceding the year for which the cost-of-living adjustment will take effect, for each expenditure category specified in subdivision (a) within the following geographical areas: Los Angeles-Long Beach-Anaheim, San Francisco-Oakland, San Diego, and, to the extent statistically valid information is available from the Bureau of Labor Statistics, additional geographical areas within the state which include not less than 80 percent of recipients of aid under this chapter.

(3) Calculate a weighted percentage change for each of the expenditure categories specified in subdivision (a) using the applicable weighting factors for each area used by the State Department of Industrial Relations to calculate the California Consumer Price Index (CCPI).

(4) Calculate a category adjustment factor for each expenditure category in subdivision (a) by (1)
 adding 100 to the applicable weighted percentage change as determined in paragraph (2) and (2) dividing the sum by 100.

(5) Determine the expenditure amounts for the current year by multiplying each expenditure amount determined for the prior year by the applicable category adjustment factor determined in paragraph (4).

(6) Determine the overall adjustment factor by dividing (1) the sum of the expenditure amounts as determined in paragraph (4) for the current year by (2) the sum of the expenditure amounts as determined in subdivision (d) for the prior year.

(b) The overall adjustment factor determined by the preceding computation steps shall be multiplied by the schedules established pursuant to Section 11452 and subdivision (a) of Section 11450 as are in effect during the month of June preceding the fiscal year in
 which the adjustments are to occur and the product rounded to the nearest dollar. The resultant amounts shall constitute the new schedules which shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(c) (1) No adjustment to the maximum aid payment set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 shall be made under this section for the purpose of increasing the benefits under this chapter for the 1990–91, 1991–92, 1992–93, 1993–94, 1994–95, 1995–96, 1996–97, and 1997–98 fiscal years, and through October 31, 1998, to reflect any change in the cost of living. For the 1998–99 fiscal year, the cost-of-living adjustment that would have been provided on July 1, 1998, pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made on November 1, 1998. No adjustment to the maximum aid payment set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 shall be made under this section for the purpose of increasing the benefits under this chapter for the 2005–06 and 2006–07 fiscal
 years to reflect any change in the cost of living. Elimination of the cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the requirements of Section 11453.05, and no further reduction shall be made pursuant to that section.

(2) No adjustment to the minimum basic standard of adequate care set forth in Section 11452 shall be made under this section for the purpose of increasing the benefits under this chapter for the 1990–91 and 1991–92 fiscal years to reflect any change in the cost of living.

(3) In any fiscal year commencing with the 2000–01 fiscal year to the 2003–04 fiscal year, inclusive, when there is any increase in tax relief pursuant to the applicable paragraph of subdivision (a) of Section 10754 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, then the increase pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section shall occur. In any fiscal year commencing with the 2000–01 fiscal
 year to the 2003–04 fiscal year, inclusive, when there is no increase in tax relief pursuant to the applicable paragraph of subdivision (a) of Section 10754 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, then any increase pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section shall be suspended.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), an adjustment to the maximum aid payments set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 shall be made under this section for the 2002–03 fiscal year, but the adjustment shall become effective June 1, 2003.

(5) No adjustment to the maximum aid payment set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 shall be made under this section for the purpose of increasing benefits under this chapter for the 2007–08, 2008–09, and 2009–10 fiscal years.

(6) For the 2010–11 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, no adjustment
 to the maximum aid payment set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 shall be made under this section unless otherwise specified by statute.

(d) Adjustments for subsequent fiscal years pursuant to this section shall not include any adjustments for any fiscal year in which the cost of living was suspended pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 55.5.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11453.01.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2022, and each year thereafter, the maximum aid payment set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 shall be adjusted annually to reflect any increases or decreases in the cost of living, and these adjustments shall become effective October 1 of each year. The annual cost-of-living adjustment shall be based on the increase in the California Necessities Index for the year in which the adjustment becomes effective.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), unless otherwise specified in the annual Budget Act, the cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a), commencing on or after July 1, 2022, and for each year thereafter, shall be 0 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 27.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11453.1.

(a) It is the intent of this section to assure that the food purchasing power provided by benefits available from CalFresh under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (Chapter 51 (commencing with Section 2011), Title 7, United States Code) shall continue to be available to recipients of aid under this chapter, if, when and during such times as federal law is amended to preclude CalFresh
 benefits to such recipients, but does expressly permit the equivalent of such benefits to be provided as cash benefits to such recipients.

(b) It is the further intent of this section to protect the financial interest of the state and counties by accomplishing the conversion of CalFresh benefits in such a manner that the conversion does not result in state and county costs of aid exceeding the costs in the base year, as hereinafter defined in this section.

(c) If federal law is amended to preclude the provision of CalFresh benefits pursuant to the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program to applicants or recipients of aid under this chapter, when such federal law becomes operative, such of the following provisions for converting CalFresh benefits to cash benefits as is consistent with the intent of this section shall become operative immediately:

(1) The bonus value of CalFresh benefits shall be paid in addition to the amounts payable pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11450, provided that aggregate state and county expenditures pursuant to that section and this section do not thereby exceed the base-year costs.

(2) If aggregate state and county expenditures pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11450 and this section in any fiscal year would, by virtue of the operation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of this section, result in an increase over the aggregate of such expenditures in the base year, the bonus value of CalFresh benefits paid pursuant to this section shall be reduced, on a pro rata basis, by such amount as will reduce aggregate state and county expenditures under that section and this section to an amount equal to the aggregate state and county expenditures in the base year.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “base year” means that year designated by federal law as the year fixing the limit on nonfederal expenditures for programs established to implement programs under Part A of Title 4 of the Social Security Act.

(e) For purposes of this section, “bonus value of CalFresh benefits” means the dollar amount that federal law permits to be paid to a child or a family of given size as a cash benefit in lieu of benefits under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

(f) For purposes of this section, “aggregate state and county expenditure” is defined as expenditure made under subdivision (a) of Section 11450 and this section, after deducting any federal reimbursements or credits, and excluding any cost-of-living increment paid pursuant to Section 11453.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 56.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11453.2.

A county shall issue vouchers or vendor payments for at least rent and utilities payments, for any assistance unit in which any parent or caretaker relative has been subject to sanction of a consecutive period of not less than three months. Vouchers or vendor payments shall continue until the parent or caretaker relative is no longer subject to the sanction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 143.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11454.

(a) A parent or caretaker relative shall not be eligible for aid under this chapter when the parent or caretaker relative has received aid under this chapter or from any state under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program (Part A (commencing with Section 401) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.)) for a cumulative total of 48 months.

(b) (1) Except as otherwise specified in subdivision (c), Section 11454.5, or other law, all months of aid received under this chapter from January 1, 1998, to the operative date of this section, inclusive, shall be applied to the 48-month time limit described in subdivision (a).

(2) All months of aid received from January 1, 1998, to the operative date of this section, inclusive, in any state pursuant to the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program (Part A (commencing with Section 401) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.)), shall be applied to the 48-month time limit described in subdivision (a).

(c) Subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall not be applicable when all parents or caretaker relatives of the aided child who are living in the home of the child meet any of the following requirements:

(1) They are 60 years of age or older.

(2) They meet one of the conditions specified in paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(3) They are not included in the assistance unit.

(4) They are receiving benefits under Section 12200 or 12300, State Disability Insurance benefits or Workers’ Compensation Temporary Disability Insurance, if the disability significantly impairs the recipient’s ability to be regularly employed or participate in welfare-to-work activities.

(5) They are incapable of maintaining employment or participating in welfare-to-work activities, as determined by the county, based on the assessment of the individual and the individual has a history of participation and full cooperation in welfare-to-work activities.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11454, as added by the act that
 added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 60.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11454.

(a) A parent or caretaker relative shall not be eligible for aid under this chapter when the parent or caretaker relative has received aid under this chapter or from any state under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program (Part A (commencing with Section 401) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.)) for a cumulative total of 60 months.

(b) (1) Except as otherwise specified in subdivision (c), Section 11454.5, or other law, all months of aid received under this chapter from January 1, 1998, to the operative date of this section, inclusive, shall be applied to the 60-month time limit described in subdivision (a).

(2) All months of
 aid received from January 1, 1998, to the operative date of this section, inclusive, in any state pursuant to the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program (Part A (commencing with Section 401) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.)), shall be applied to the 60-month time limit described in subdivision (a).

(c) Subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall not be applicable when all parents or caretaker relatives of the aided child who are living in the home of the child meet any of the following requirements:

(1) They are 60 years of age or older.

(2) They meet one of the conditions specified in paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(3) They are not included in the assistance
 unit.

(4) They are receiving benefits under Section 12200 or 12300, State Disability Insurance benefits or Workers’ Compensation Temporary Disability Insurance, if the disability significantly impairs the recipient’s ability to be regularly employed or participate in welfare-to-work activities.

(5) They are incapable of maintaining employment or participating in welfare-to-work activities, as determined by the county, based on the assessment of the individual and the individual has a history of participation and full cooperation in welfare-to-work activities.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other statute, regulation, or other state requirement, the department shall automate a one-time process that allows former
 CalWORKs recipients excluded from an existing assistance unit due to the formerly applicable 48-month time limit, but who have fewer than 60 countable months of time on aid in CalWORKs, to be added to the existing assistance unit if all information needed to complete an eligibility determination is in the case record and all other eligibility requirements have been met.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other statute, regulation, or other state requirement, the county shall not require a former CalWORKs recipient excluded from an existing assistance unit due to the formerly applicable 48-month time limit to complete and submit CalWORKs forms CW 8, CW 8A, CW 2.1NA, or CW 2.1Q in order to add the former recipient to the existing assistance unit pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) A CalWORKs recipient added to an existing assistance unit pursuant to paragraph (1) shall complete and submit to the county CalWORKs forms CW 2.1NA and CW 2.1Q pertaining to child support within 60 days of being added to the assistance unit, or by the next scheduled semiannual report or annual redetermination, whichever is earlier.

(3) This subdivision shall only remain operative for 120 days from the date of the operation of this section pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) This section shall become operative on May 1,
 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 61) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 41.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11454.1.

(a) County welfare departments shall provide each recipient who is subject to the 60-month time limitation described in subdivision (a) of Section 11454 with written notice describing the 60-month time limitation described in that subdivision and the process by which recipients may claim exemptions from, and extensions to, the time limit.

(b) The notice described in subdivision (a) shall be provided at the time the individual applies for aid, during the recipient’s annual redetermination, and at least once after the individual has participated for a total of 54 months, and prior to the end of the 57th month, that count toward the 60-month time limit.

(c) The notice described in
 this section shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(1) The number of remaining months the adult recipient may be eligible to receive aid.

(2) The manner in which the recipient may dispute the number of months counted toward the 60-month time limit.

(d) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 62.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11454.5.

(a) Any month in which the following conditions exist shall not be counted as a month of receipt of aid for the purposes of subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, Section 11454:

(1) The recipient is exempt from participation under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) due to disability, or advanced age in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3, or due to caretaking responsibilities that impair the recipient’s ability to be regularly employed, in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(2) The recipient is eligible for, participating in, or
 exempt from, the Cal-Learn Program provided for pursuant to Article 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11331), for any period during which the Cal-Learn Program is operative, is participating in another teen parent program approved by the department, or is a nonminor dependent under the supervision of the county welfare or probation department who is placed in an approved relative’s home and is eligible for aid under this section because the recipient satisfies the conditions described in Section 11403.

(3) The cost of the cash aid provided to the recipient for the month is fully reimbursed by child support, whether collected in that month or any subsequent month.

(4) The family is a former recipient of cash aid under this chapter and currently receives only childcare, case management, or supportive services pursuant to Section 11323.2 or
 Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(5) To the extent provided by federal law, the recipient lived in Indian country, as defined by federal law, or an Alaskan native village in which at least 50 percent of the adults living in the Indian country or in the village are not employed.

(6) The recipient received CalWORKs for any month between August 1, 2009, and January 1, 2015, and was either exempt from participation under paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3, or was exempt from participation and was not reengaged in accordance with subdivision (h) of Section 11320.3, as that section read on June 30, 2020.

(7) The recipient is exempt from
 participating in welfare-to-work activities because the recipient has primary responsibility for personally providing care to a child 24 months of age or younger, pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(b) In cases where a lump-sum diversion payment is provided in lieu of cash aid under Section 11266.5, the month in which the payment is made or the months calculated pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 11266.5 shall count against the limits specified in Section 11454.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on October 1, 2024, unless the changes made by Section 11454.5, as added by the act that added this subdivision, cannot be implemented without an update to the Statewide Automated Welfare Systems (SAWS), in
 which case, this section shall become inoperative on the date the department notifies the Legislature that SAWS can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11454.5, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 588, Sec. 7.   (AB 2300)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative on or after October 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 230 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 131.)
-------------------------------------------

11454.5.

(a) Any month in which the following conditions exist shall not be counted as a month of receipt of aid for the purposes of subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, Section 11454:

(1) The recipient is exempt from participation under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) due to disability, or advanced age in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3, or due to caretaking responsibilities that impair the recipient’s ability to be regularly employed, in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(2) The recipient is eligible for, participating in, or exempt from, the Cal-Learn Program provided for pursuant to Article 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11331), for any period during which the Cal-Learn Program is operative, is participating in another teen parent program approved by the department, or is a nonminor dependent under the supervision of the county welfare or probation department who is placed in an approved relative’s home and is eligible for aid under this section because the recipient satisfies the conditions described in Section 11403.

(3) The cost of the cash aid provided to the recipient for the month is fully reimbursed by child support, whether collected in that month or any subsequent month.

(4) The family is a former recipient of cash aid under this chapter and currently receives only childcare, case management, or supportive services pursuant to Section 11323.2 or Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(5) To the extent provided by federal law, the recipient lived in Indian country, as defined by federal law, or an Alaskan native village in which at least 50 percent of the adults living in the Indian country or in the village are not employed.

(6) The recipient received CalWORKs for any month between August 1, 2009, and January 1, 2015, and was either exempt from participation under paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3, or was exempt from participation and was not reengaged in accordance with subdivision (h) of Section 11320.3, as that section read on June 30, 2020.

(7) The recipient is exempt from participating in welfare-to-work activities because the recipient has primary responsibility for personally providing care to a child 24 months of age or younger, pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A)
 of paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(8) The recipient is receiving Paid Family Leave benefits.

(b) In cases where a lump-sum diversion payment is provided in lieu of cash aid under Section 11266.5, the month in which the payment is made or the months calculated pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 11266.5 shall count against the limits specified in Section 11454.

(c) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2024, unless the changes made by the act that added this section cannot be implemented without an update to the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS), in which case, this section shall become operative on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that SAWS has been updated to perform the necessary automation to implement this
 section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 588, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 230.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11454.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 15200, to the extent that the exemptions from the time limits on aid specified in paragraphs (1), (2), (4), and (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 11454 and subdivision (a) of Section 11454.5 exceed 20 percent of the number of families aided in a county, for a period as determined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, for purposes of measuring the hardship exemption for time limits, the county shall be responsible for the amount of aid that would otherwise have
 been paid through federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant funds pursuant to Section 11450, with respect to those persons exempt under either paragraphs (1), (2), (4), and (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 11454 or subdivision (a) of Section 11454.5 that exceed the 20 percent hardship exemption during the period determined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and provided for in federal law.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply if the statewide percentage of families aided during that period is 20 percent or less.

(c) The department may determine that a county has good cause for exceeding the 20-percent limitation provided for in subdivision (a). Under this determination, the county share may be reduced or waived by the department.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that
 the steering committee as specified in Section 10544.317 review this provision to ensure that:

(1) The state does not exceed the limit on hardship exemptions as provided in federal law.

(2) Counties are not penalized for circumstances beyond their control and that statewide flexibility for allocation of the percentages is assured.

(3) Recipients will have access to the hardship exemption, regardless of their county of origin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 34.   Effective August 16, 2004.   Operative December 1, 2004, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 229.   Note: See Sec. 64.6 of Ch. 229 regarding implementation.)
-------------------------------------------

11455.

If on the first day of the month a child is eligible for aid, aid for the entire month shall be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11457.

(a) Money from noncustodial parents for child or spousal support with respect to whom an assignment under Section 11477 has been made shall be paid directly to the local child support agency and shall not be paid directly to the family. Absent parent support payments, when collected by or paid through any public officer or agency, shall be transmitted to the county department providing aid under this chapter until a procedure is established under subdivision (b).

(b) The
 Department of Child Support Services, by regulation, shall work in conjunction with the California State Association of Counties, the County Welfare Director’s Association, the Child Support Director’s Association, and other pertinent stakeholders to establish procedures not in conflict with federal law, for the collection and distribution of noncustodial parent support payments.

(c) If an amount collected as child or spousal support represents payment on the required support obligation for future months, the amount shall be applied to such future months. However, no such amounts shall be applied to future months unless amounts have been collected which fully satisfy the support obligation assigned under subdivision (a) of Section 11477 for the current months and all past months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 28.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11458.

The county may cancel, suspend or revoke aid under this chapter for cause. Upon instructions from the department, the county shall cancel, suspend or revoke aid under this chapter.

Upon request of the department, an immediate report of every suspension of aid shall be made to the department stating the reason for the suspension and showing the action of the county in approving the suspension.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11460.

(a) (1) Foster care providers shall be paid a per child per month rate in return for the care and supervision of the AFDC-FC child placed with them. The department is designated the single organizational unit whose duty it shall be to administer a state system for establishing rates in the AFDC-FC program. State functions shall be performed by the department or by delegation of the department to county welfare departments or Indian tribes, consortia of tribes, or tribal organizations that have entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1.

(2) Foster
 care providers that care for a child in a home-based setting described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 11461, or in a certified home or an approved resource family of a foster family agency, shall be paid the per child per month rate as set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 11461, or, on and after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the rate developed pursuant to the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, as applicable.

(3) (A) In addition to administering the state
 system of rates described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), at the request of and in consultation with a county, the department shall have the authority to develop, implement, and approve alternative funding models and set individualized rates for innovative AFDC-FC programs or models of care and services that are consistent with statewide licensing and program requirements and that provide children with service alternatives to residential care, enhance the ability of children to remain in the least restrictive, most family-like setting possible, and promote services that address the needs and strengths of individual children and their families.

(B) A county that chooses to request an alternative funding model or individualized rate under this paragraph shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any additional cost for providing these innovative programs or models of care and services that exceeds the nonfederal portions of the state system of
 rates established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(C) (i) The provider shall indicate in the program statement the innovative approach or model of care and services for which there is a recognized need that the county seeks to meet.

(ii) The requesting county, in consultation with the department, shall monitor the performance and outcomes of the provider consistent with the program statement to ensure that the purposes of the innovative program or model of care and services will be achieved commensurate with the alternative funding model or individualized rate.

(D) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this paragraph by means of all-county letters or similar written directives, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar written directives shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations, no later than January 1, 2030.

(b) “Care and supervision” includes food, clothing, shelter, daily supervision, school supplies, a child’s personal incidentals, liability insurance with respect to a child, reasonable travel to the child’s home for visitation, and reasonable travel for the child to remain in the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement. Reimbursement for the costs of educational travel, as provided for in this subdivision, shall be made pursuant to procedures determined by the department, in consultation with
 representatives of county welfare and probation directors, and additional stakeholders, as appropriate.

(1) For a child or youth placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program or a licensed foster family agency, care and supervision shall also include reasonable administration and operational activities necessary to provide the items listed in this subdivision.

(2) For a child or youth placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program or a licensed foster family agency, care and supervision may also include reasonable activities performed by social workers employed by the program provider that are not otherwise considered daily supervision or administration activities.

(c) A foster care provider that accepts payments, following the effective date of this section, based on a rate established under this section, shall not receive rate increases or retroactive payments as the result of litigation challenging rates established prior to the effective date of this section. This shall apply regardless of whether a provider is a party to the litigation or a member of a class covered by the litigation.

(d) A county is not precluded from using a portion of its county funds to increase rates paid to family homes, foster family agencies, and short-term residential therapeutic programs within that county, and to make payments for specialized care increments, clothing allowances, or infant supplements to homes within that county, solely at that county’s expense.

(e) A county is not precluded from providing a supplemental rate to serve commercially sexually exploited foster children to provide for the additional care and supervision needs of these children. To the extent that federal
 financial participation is available, it is the intent of the Legislature that the federal funding shall be utilized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 22.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11461.

(a) For children or, on and after January 1, 2012, nonminor dependents placed in a licensed or approved family home with a capacity of six or less, or in an approved home of a relative or nonrelated legal guardian, or the approved home of a nonrelative extended family member, as described in Section 362.7, or, on and after January 1, 2012, a supervised independent living placement, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, the per child per month basic rates in the following schedule shall be in effect for the period July 1, 1989, through December 31, 1989: AgeBasic rate 0–4$294 5–8 $319 9–11 $34012–14 $37815–20 $412

(b) (1) Any county that, as of October 1, 1989, has in effect a basic rate that is at the levels set forth in
 the schedule in subdivision (a), shall continue to receive state participation, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 15200, at these levels.

(2) Any county that, as of October 1, 1989, has in effect a basic rate that exceeds a level set forth in the schedule in subdivision (a), shall continue to receive the same level of state participation as it received on October 1, 1989.

(c) The amounts in the schedule of basic rates in subdivision (a) shall be adjusted as follows:

(1) Effective January 1, 1990, the amounts in the schedule of basic rates in subdivision (a) shall be increased by 12 percent.

(2) Effective May 1, 1990, any county that did not increase the basic rate by 12 percent on January 1, 1990, shall do both of the following:

(A) Increase the basic rate in effect December 31, 1989, for which state participation is received by 12 percent.

(B) Increase the basic rate, as adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (A), by an additional 5 percent.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), effective July 1, 1990, for the 1990–91 fiscal year, the amounts in the schedule of basic rates in subdivision (a) shall be increased by an additional 5 percent.

(B) The rate increase required by subparagraph (A) shall not be applied to rates increased May 1, 1990, pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) Effective July 1, 1998, the amounts in the schedule of basic rates in subdivision (a) shall be increased by 6 percent.
 Notwithstanding any other law, the 6-percent increase provided for in this paragraph shall, retroactive to July 1, 1998, apply to every county, including any county to which paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) applies, and shall apply to foster care for every age group.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, any increase that takes effect after July 1, 1998, shall apply to every county, including any county to which paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) applies, and shall apply to foster care for every age group.
